Colorado, session 2026A, SB009.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-26-102, amend
(2.5) as follows:
39-26-102. Performance statement - definitions - repeal.
As used in this article 26, unless the context otherwise requires:
(2.5) "Charitable organization" means any entity organized and
operated exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, testing for public
safety, literary, or educational purposes, or to foster national or international
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

amateur sports competition (but only if no part of its activities involve the
provision of athletic facilities or equipment), or for the prevention of cruelty
to children or animals, no part of the net earnings of which inures to the
benefit of any private shareholder or individual, no substantial part of the
activities of which is carrying on propaganda, or otherwise attempting, to
influence legislation, and which does not participate in, or intervene in
(including the publishing or distributing of statements), any political
campaign on behalf of any candidate for public office, or any veterans'
organization registered under section 501 (c)(19) of the federal "Internal
Revenue Code of 1986", as amended. IN DETERMINING WHETHER AN
ORGANIZATION QUALIFIES AS A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION, THE
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL PRESUME THAT AN ORGANIZATION THAT
PRESENTS THE DEPARTMENT WITH A 501(c)(3) DETERMINATION LETTER
FROM THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE QUALIFIES AS A CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT PRESUME THAT AN
ORGANIZATION DOES NOT QUALIFY AS A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION
BECAUSE OF A CHANGE IN THE ORGANIZATION'S 501(c)(3) STATUS. NOTHING
IN THIS SUBSECTION (2.5) PREVENTS THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE FROM
REVIEWING WHETHER AN ORGANIZATION QUALIFIES AS A "CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION" FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION (2.5).
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-009

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-009